Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 1996, chapter 471, article 2, section 30, subdivision 5, as amended by Laws 2009, chapter 88, article 4, section 17, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Expiration of taxing authority. The tax imposed under subdivision 1 expires deleted text begin 30 years after it first becomes effectivedeleted text end new text begin on July 1, 2056new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of the city of Little Falls and its chief clerical officer comply with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end